Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.060

Commission—Mediation activities—Other dispute resolution procedures authorized.

The commission shall conduct mediation activities upon the request of either party as a means of assisting in the settlement of unresolved matters considered under this chapter.

In the event that any matter being jointly considered by the employee organization and the board of trustees of the college district is not settled by the means provided in this chapter, either party, twenty-four hours after serving written notice of its intended action to the other party, may, request the assistance and advice of the commission. Nothing in this section prohibits an employer and an employee organization from agreeing to substitute, at their own expense, some other impasse procedure or other means of resolving matters considered under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 238 s 150; 1987 c 314 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 13; 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 205: See note following RCW 28B.52.020.